Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-820
Ballots; political party circle or other predetermined selection; prohibited.

No official ballot for an elective office within this state shall contain any political party circle or any provision for voting for all candidates of one political party or for a predetermined selection of candidates of one political party by the making of a mark or other indication.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 241.

This section is independent legislation abolishing the party circle, a repeal as distinguished from an amendment, and is constitutional. State ex rel. Kaspar v. Lehmkuhl, 127 Neb. 812, 257 N.W. 229 (1934).